Washington statutes.
RCW 26.34.070

"Executive head" defined—Compact administrator.

As used in Article VII of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, the term "executive head" means the governor. The governor is hereby authorized to appoint a compact administrator in accordance with the terms of said Article VII.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 168 s 7.]